Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-639
Manufacturer-distributor; employee, agent, or spouse; restriction on activities.

No manufacturer-distributor shall be licensed to conduct any other activity under the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act. No manufacturer-distributor shall hold a license to conduct any other kind of gambling activity which is authorized or regulated under Chapter 9 except as provided in section 9-632. No manufacturer-distributor or employee, agent, or spouse of any manufacturer-distributor shall play in any lottery conducted by any county, city, or village or participate in the conduct or operation of any lottery conducted by any county, city, or village or any other kind of gambling activity which is authorized or regulated under Chapter 9 except to the exclusive extent of his or her statutory duties as a licensed manufacturer-distributor and as provided in sections 9-255.07, 9-255.09, 9-330, and 9-332.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 79;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 61;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 111.